Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.717 and 2020 c 275 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender sentenced under this chapter or chapter 9.94B RCW is supervised by the department, the offender may earn supervision compliance credit in accordance with procedures that are developed and adopted by the department. Such procedures shall be available on the department's website.(a) The supervision compliance credit shall be awarded to offenders who are in compliance with supervision terms ((and are making progress towards the goals of their individualized supervision case plan, including: Participation in specific targeted interventions, risk-related programming, or treatment; or completing steps towards specific targeted goals that enhance protective factors and stability)), as determined by the department.(b) For each month in compliance with ((community custody conditions))supervision terms in accordance with (a) of this subsection, an offender may earn supervision compliance credit of ((ten))10 days.(c) Supervision compliance credit is accrued monthly and time shall not be applied to an offender's term of supervision prior to the earning of the time.(d) An offender shall lose the ability to earn supervision compliance credits if the offender is sanctioned by a court for noncompliance with community custody requirements.(2) An offender is not eligible to earn supervision compliance credit if he or she:(a) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 or 10.95.030;(b) Was sentenced to any sentencing alternative under ((RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670))this chapter;(c) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745;(d) Is subject to a governor's conditional commutation;(e) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.017; or(((e)))(f) Is serving community custody pursuant to early release under RCW 9.94A.730.--- END ---